District of Columbia statutes.
34-102

Corporations subject to this subtitle.

Corporations formed to acquire property or to transact business which would be subject to the provisions of this subtitle, and corporations possessing franchises for any of the purposes contemplated by this subtitle shall be deemed to be subject to the provisions of this subtitle, although no property may have been acquired, business transacted, or franchises exercised.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 977, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1
Highway plans, “utility” defined, see § 9-107.02.
1981 Ed., § 43-223.
1973 Ed., § 43-123.